West Virginia, session 2026, HB4321.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Senior Services. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 21, 2025, authorized under the authority of §16-5S-9a of this code, relating to the Senior Services (shared table initiative for senior citizens, 76 CSR 06), is authorized.